Connecticut, session 2026, HB05220.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 4b-3 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) The [chairman] chairperson of the board shall be compensated
[two] three hundred dollars per diem up to a maximum of [thirty] forty-
five thousand dollars annually. Other members of the board shall be
compensated [two] three hundred dollars per diem up to a maximum
of [twenty-five] forty thousand dollars annually. The members of the
board shall choose their own [chairman] chairperson. No person shall
serve on [this] the board who holds another state or municipal
governmental position and no person on the board shall be directly
involved in any enterprise which does business with the state or directly
or indirectly involved in any enterprise concerned with real estate
acquisition or development.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 4b-3(b)
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5220
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b), in the fourth sentence, extraneous text was deleted to
accurately reflect the subsection.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2